Montana, session 2025, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 75-2-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-2-109. Small business stationary source representative -- duties. (1) The department shall
establish a small business stationary source representative position that is not located in a regulatory program
of the department and not subject to direct supervision by a regulatory program of the department.
(2) The small business stationary source representative shall represent the interests of small
business stationary sources before the department and other appropriate local, state, and federal agencies
concerning the implementation and application of the requirements of this chapter. In addition, the
representative shall provide assistance to small business stationary sources in meeting the requirements of this
chapter. In carrying out these activities, the representative shall:
(a) monitor the activities of the small business stationary source technical and environmental
compliance assistance program;
(b) review and provide comments and recommendations to the department, local air pollution
control programs, the environmental quality council, as appropriate, and the appropriate federal agencies
regarding the development and implementation of regulations pertaining to air quality that impact small
business stationary sources;
(c) facilitate and promote the participation of small business stationary sources in the development
of new regulations pertaining to air quality that impact small business stationary sources;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 64
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 64
(d) assist in the preparation and dissemination of reports and other information regarding the
applicability of the requirements of this chapter to small business stationary sources;
(e) assist in the preparation of guideline documents by the small business stationary source
technical and environmental compliance assistance program to ensure that these documents are readily
understandable by the lay person;
(f) assist small business stationary sources and their trade associations to encourage voluntary
compliance with the requirements of this chapter;
(g) cooperate with appropriate local, state, and federal agencies and private sector financial
institutions to assist small business stationary sources in locating financial assistance necessary for compliance
with the requirements of this chapter;
(h) consult with the small business compliance assistance advisory council small businesses and
other stakeholders at regular intervals throughout the year regarding problems faced by small business
stationary sources concerning the implementation and application of the requirements of this chapter; and
(i) perform other duties as may be necessary to meet the requirements of the federal Clean Air
Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401, et seq.
(3) Subject to Article II, section 9, of the Montana constitution, the small business stationary source
representative may not provide information that the representative obtains from a small business stationary
source to the department for use in any administrative or judicial action to enforce the requirements of this
chapter, unless the information discloses a violation that constitutes an imminent and substantial danger to
human health, safety, or the environment."
Section 2. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
2-15-2110. Small business compliance assistance advisory council.
75-2-106. Small business compliance assistance advisory council -- duties -- secretary -- meetings.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 64
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 64, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 64
INTRODUCED BY J. DARLING
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
AN ACT ELIMINATING THE SMALL BUSINESS COMPLIANCE ASSISTANCE ADVISORY COUNCIL FROM
THE CLEAN AIR ACT OF MONTANA; REVISING THE DUTIES OF A SMALL BUSINESS STATIONARY
SOURCE REPRESENTATIVE; AMENDING SECTION 75-2-109, MCA; AND REPEALING SECTIONS 2-15-
2110 AND 75-2-106 MCA.”